Utah statutes.
63M-1-201.   Creation of office.
(1)  There is created the Governor's Office of Economic Development.
(2)  The office shall:
(a)  be responsible for economic development within the state;
(b)  perform economic development planning for the state;
(c)  administer and coordinate all state or federal grant programs which are,
or become available, for economic development;
(d)  administer any other programs over which the office is given
administrative supervision by the governor;
(e)  annually submit a report to the Legislature by October 1; and
(f)  perform any other duties as provided by the Legislature.
(3)  The office may solicit and accept contributions of moneys, services, and
facilities from any other source, public or private, but may not use the
moneys for publicizing the exclusive interest of the donor.
(4)  Moneys received under Subsection (3) shall be deposited in the General
Fund as dedicated credits of the office.
